Illinois, session 104th, SB118.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Crime Victims Compensation Act is amended 5by changing Sections 2, 4.1, 4.2, 6.1, 7.1, 8.1, and 10.2 as 6follows: 7    (740 ILCS 45/2)8    Sec. 2. Definitions. As used in this Act, unless the 9context otherwise requires:10    (a) "Applicant" means any of the following claiming 11compensation under this Act:12        (1) A victim.13        (2) If the victim was a guardian or primary caregiver 14    to an adult who is physically or mentally incapacitated, 15    that adult who is physically or mentally incapacitated.16        (3) A guardian of a minor or of a person under legal 17    disability.18        (4) A person who, at the time the crime occurred, 19    resided in the same dwelling as the victim, solely for the 20    purpose of compensating for any of the following:21            (A) Pecuniary loss incurred for psychological 22        treatment of a mental or emotional condition caused or 23        aggravated by the crime.  SB0118 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 08024 KTG 18070 b1            (B) Loss of earnings under paragraph (14.5) of 2        subsection (h) for time off from work necessary to 3        provide full time care for the injured victim.4            (C) Relocation expenses.5        (5) A person who assumes a legal obligation or 6    voluntarily pays for a victim's medical or funeral or 7    burial expenses.8        (6) Any other person the Court of Claims or the 9    Attorney General finds is entitled to compensation.10    The changes made to this subsection by Public Act 101-652 11apply to actions commenced or pending on or after January 1, 122022.13    (b) "Court of Claims" means the Court of Claims created by 14the Court of Claims Act.15    (c) "Crime of violence" means and includes any offense 16defined in Sections 9-1, 9-1.2, 9-2, 9-2.1, 9-3, 9-3.2, 10-1, 1710-2, 10-9, 11-1.20, 11-1.30, 11-1.40, 11-1.50, 11-1.60, 1811-11, 11-20.1, 11-23, 11-23.5, 12-1, 12-2, 12-3, 12-3.05, 1912-3.1, 12-3.2, 12-3.3, 12-3.4, 12-5, 12-7.1, 12-7.3, 12-7.4, 2012-20.5, 20-1 or 20-1.1, or Section 12-3.05 except for 21subdivision (a)(4) or (g)(1), or subdivision (a)(4) of Section 2211-14.4, of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 232012, Sections 1(a) and 1(a-5) of the Cemetery Protection Act, 24Section 125 of the Stalking No Contact Order Act, Section 219 25of the Civil No Contact Order Act, driving under the influence 26as defined in Section 11-501 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, a   SB0118 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 08024 KTG 18070 b1violation of Section 11-401 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, 2provided the victim was a pedestrian or was operating a 3vehicle moved solely by human power or a mobility device at the 4time of contact, and a violation of Section 11-204.1 of the 5Illinois Vehicle Code; so long as the offense did not occur 6during a civil riot, insurrection or rebellion. "Crime of 7violence" does not include any other offense or crash 8involving a motor vehicle except those vehicle offenses 9specifically provided for in this paragraph. "Crime of 10violence" does include all of the offenses specifically 11provided for in this paragraph that occur within this State 12but are subject to federal jurisdiction and crimes involving 13terrorism as defined in 18 U.S.C. 2331.14    (d) "Victim" means (1) a person killed or injured in this 15State as a result of a crime of violence perpetrated or 16attempted against him or her, (2) the spouse, parent, or child 17of a person killed or injured in this State as a result of a 18crime of violence perpetrated or attempted against the person, 19or anyone living in the dwelling of a person killed or injured 20in a relationship that is substantially similar to that of a 21parent, spouse, or child, (3) a person killed or injured in 22this State while attempting to assist a person against whom a 23crime of violence is being perpetrated or attempted, if that 24attempt of assistance would be expected of a reasonable person 25under the circumstances, (4) a person killed or injured in 26this State while assisting a law enforcement official   SB0118 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 08024 KTG 18070 b1apprehend a person who has perpetrated a crime of violence or 2prevent the perpetration of any such crime if that assistance 3was in response to the express request of the law enforcement 4official, (5) a person who personally witnessed a violent 5crime, (5.05) a person who will be called as a witness by the 6prosecution to establish a necessary nexus between the 7offender and the violent crime, (5.1) any person who is the 8grandparent, grandchild, brother, sister, half brother, or 9half sister of a person killed or injured in this State as a 10result of a crime of violence, applying solely for the purpose 11of compensating for pecuniary loss incurred for psychological 12treatment of a mental or emotional condition caused or 13aggravated by the crime, loss of earnings under paragraph 14(14.5) of subsection (h) for time off from work necessary to 15provide full time care for the injured victim, or relocation 16if the crime occurred within the dwelling of the applicant, 17(5.2) any person who was in a dating relationship with a person 18killed in this State as a result of a crime of violence, solely 19for the purpose of compensating for pecuniary loss incurred 20for psychological treatment of a mental or emotional condition 21caused or aggravated by the crime, (6) an Illinois resident 22who is a victim of a "crime of violence" as defined in this Act 23except, if the crime occurred outside this State, the resident 24has the same rights under this Act as if the crime had occurred 25in this State upon a showing that the state, territory, 26country, or political subdivision of a country in which the   SB0118 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 08024 KTG 18070 b1crime occurred does not have a compensation of victims of 2crimes law for which that Illinois resident is eligible, (7) 3the parent, spouse, or child of a deceased person whose body is 4dismembered or whose remains are desecrated as the result of a 5crime of violence, (8) (blank), or (9) an individual who is 6injured or killed in an incident in which a law enforcement 7officer's use of force caused bodily harm or death to that 8individual.9    (e) "Dependent" means a relative of a deceased victim who 10was wholly or partially dependent upon the victim's income at 11the time of his or her death and shall include the child of a 12victim born after his or her death.13    (f) "Relative" means a spouse, parent, grandparent, 14stepfather, stepmother, child, grandchild, brother, 15brother-in-law, sister, sister-in-law, half brother, half 16sister, spouse's parent, nephew, niece, uncle, aunt, or anyone 17living in the dwelling of a person killed or injured in a 18relationship that is substantially similar to that of a 19parent, spouse, or child.20    (g) "Child" means a son or daughter and includes a 21stepchild, an adopted child or a child born out of wedlock.22    (h) "Pecuniary loss" means:23        (1) in the case of injury, appropriate medical 24    expenses and hospital expenses including expenses of 25    medical examinations, rehabilitation, medically required 26    nursing care expenses, appropriate psychiatric care or   SB0118 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 08024 KTG 18070 b1    psychiatric counseling expenses, appropriate expenses for 2    care or counseling by a licensed clinical psychologist, 3    licensed clinical social worker, licensed professional 4    counselor, or licensed clinical professional counselor and 5    expenses for treatment by Christian Science practitioners 6    and nursing care appropriate thereto;7        (2) transportation expenses to and from medical and 8    counseling treatment facilities;9        (3) prosthetic appliances, eyeglasses, and hearing 10    aids necessary or damaged as a result of the crime;11        (4) expenses incurred for the towing and storage of a 12    victim's vehicle in connection with a crime of violence, 13    to a maximum of $1,000;14        (5) costs associated with trafficking tattoo removal 15    by a person authorized or licensed to perform the specific 16    removal procedure; for victims of offenses defined in 17    Section 10-9 of the Criminal Code of 2012, the victim 18    shall submit a statement under oath on a form prescribed 19    by the Attorney General attesting that the removed tattoo 20    was applied in connection with the commission of the 21    offense;22        (6) replacement costs for clothing and bedding used as 23    evidence;24        (7) costs associated with temporary lodging or 25    relocation necessary as a result of the crime, including, 26    but not limited to, the first 2 months' rent and security   SB0118 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 08024 KTG 18070 b1    deposit of the dwelling that the claimant relocated to and 2    other reasonable relocation expenses incurred as a result 3    of the violent crime;4        (8) locks, doors, or windows necessary or damaged as a 5    result of the crime;6        (9) the purchase, lease, or rental of equipment 7    necessary to create usability of and accessibility to the 8    victim's real and personal property, or the real and 9    personal property which is used by the victim, necessary 10    as a result of the crime; "real and personal property" 11    includes, but is not limited to, vehicles, houses, 12    apartments, townhouses, or condominiums; 13        (10) the costs of appropriate crime scene clean-up;14        (11) replacement services loss, to a maximum of $1,250 15    per month, with this amount to be divided in proportion to 16    the amount of the actual loss among those entitled to 17    compensation;18        (12) dependents replacement services loss, to a 19    maximum of $1,250 per month, with this amount to be 20    divided in proportion to the amount of the actual loss 21    among those entitled to compensation;22        (13) loss of tuition paid to attend grammar school or 23    high school when the victim had been enrolled as a student 24    prior to the injury, or college or graduate school when 25    the victim had been enrolled as a day or night student 26    prior to the injury when the victim becomes unable to   SB0118 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 08024 KTG 18070 b1    continue attendance at school as a result of the crime of 2    violence perpetrated against him or her;3        (14) loss of earnings, loss of future earnings because 4    of disability resulting from the injury. Loss of future 5    earnings shall be reduced by any income from substitute 6    work actually performed by the victim or by income the 7    victim would have earned in available appropriate 8    substitute work the victim was capable of performing but 9    unreasonably failed to undertake; loss of earnings and 10    loss of future earnings shall be determined on the basis 11    of the victim's average net monthly earnings for the 6 12    months immediately preceding the date of the injury or on 13    $2,400 per month, whichever is less, or, in cases where 14    the absences commenced more than 3 years from the date of 15    the crime, on the basis of the net monthly earnings for the 16    6 months immediately preceding the date of the first 17    absence, not to exceed $2,400 per month; 18        (14.5) loss of earnings for applicants or loss of 19    future earnings for applicants. The applicant must 20    demonstrate that the loss of earnings is a direct result 21    of circumstances attributed to the crime including, but 22    not limited to, court appearances, funeral preparation and 23    bereavement, receipt of medical or psychological care; 24    loss of earnings and loss of future earnings shall be 25    determined on the basis of the applicant's average net 26    monthly earnings for the 6 months immediately preceding   SB0118 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 08024 KTG 18070 b1    the date of the injury or on $2,400 per month, whichever is 2    less, or, in cases where the absences commenced more than 3    3 years from the date of the crime, on the basis of the net 4    monthly earnings for the 6 months immediately preceding 5    the date of the first absence, not to exceed $2,400 per 6    month; 7        (15) loss of support of the dependents of the victim. 8    Loss of support shall be determined on the basis of the 9    victim's average net monthly earnings for the 6 months 10    immediately preceding the date of the injury or on $2,400 11    per month, whichever is less, or, in cases where the 12    absences commenced more than 3 years from the date of the 13    crime, on the basis of the net monthly earnings for the 6 14    months immediately preceding the date of the first 15    absence, not to exceed $2,400 per month. If a divorced or 16    legally separated applicant is claiming loss of support 17    for a minor child of the deceased, the amount of support 18    for each child shall be based either on the amount of 19    support pursuant to the judgment prior to the date of the 20    deceased victim's injury or death, or, if the subject of 21    pending litigation filed by or on behalf of the divorced 22    or legally separated applicant prior to the injury or 23    death, on the result of that litigation. Loss of support 24    for minors shall be divided in proportion to the amount of 25    the actual loss among those entitled to such compensation; 26        (16) in the case of death, expenses for reasonable   SB0118 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 08024 KTG 18070 b1    funeral, burial, headstone, cremation, and travel and 2    transport for survivors of homicide victims to secure 3    bodies of deceased victims and to transport bodies for 4    burial all of which may be awarded up to a maximum of 5    $10,000 for each victim. Other individuals that have paid 6    or become obligated to pay funeral, cremation, or burial 7    expenses, including a headstone, for the deceased shall 8    share a maximum award of $10,000, with the award divided 9    in proportion to the amount of the actual loss among those 10    entitled to compensation;11        (17) in the case of dismemberment or desecration of a 12    body, expenses for reasonable funeral, burial, headstone, 13    and cremation, all of which may be awarded up to a maximum 14    of $10,000 for each victim. Other individuals that have 15    paid or become obligated to pay funeral, cremation, or 16    burial expenses, including a headstone, for the deceased 17    shall share a maximum award of $10,000, with the award 18    divided in proportion to the amount of the actual loss 19    among those entitled to compensation; and20        (18) (19) legal fees resulting from proceedings that 21    became necessary solely because of the crime, including, 22    but not limited to, establishing a legal guardian for the 23    minor victim or the minor child of a victim, or obtaining a 24    restraining order, no contact order, or order of 25    protection, awarded up to a maximum of $3,500. 26    "Pecuniary loss" does not include pain and suffering or   SB0118 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 08024 KTG 18070 b1property loss or damage.2    The changes made to this subsection by Public Act 101-652 3apply to actions commenced or pending on or after January 1, 42022. 5    (i) "Replacement services loss" means expenses reasonably 6incurred in obtaining ordinary and necessary services in lieu 7of those the injured person would have performed, not for 8income, but for the benefit of himself or herself or his or her 9family, if he or she had not been injured.10    (j) "Dependents replacement services loss" means loss 11reasonably incurred by dependents or private legal guardians 12of minor dependents after a victim's death in obtaining 13ordinary and necessary services in lieu of those the victim 14would have performed, not for income, but for their benefit, 15if he or she had not been fatally injured.16    (k) "Survivor" means immediate family including a parent, 17stepfather, stepmother, child, brother, sister, or spouse.18    (l) "Parent" means a natural parent, adopted parent, 19stepparent, or permanent legal guardian of another person.20    (m) "Trafficking tattoo" is a tattoo which is applied to a 21victim in connection with the commission of a violation of 22Section 10-9 of the Criminal Code of 2012.23    (n) "Dwelling" means a person's primary home. A person may 24be required to provide verification or proof of residence 25including, but not limited to, a lease agreement, utility 26bill, license registration, document showing the mailing   SB0118 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 08024 KTG 18070 b1address, pay stub, tax form, or notarized statement.2    (o) "Dating relationship" means a current, continuous, 3romantic, courtship, or engagement relationship, often 4characterized by actions of an intimate or sexual nature or an 5expectation of affection. "Dating relationship" does not 6include a casual acquaintanceship or ordinary fraternization 7between persons in a business or social context.8    (p) "Medical facility" means a facility for the delivery 9of health services. "Medical facility" includes, but is not 10limited to, a hospital, public health center, outpatient 11medical facility, federally qualified health center, migrant 12health center, community health center, or State correctional 13institution.14    (q) "Mental health provider" means a licensed clinical 15psychologist, a licensed clinical social worker, a licensed 16professional counselor, or a licensed clinical professional 17counselor as defined in the Mental Health and Developmental 18Disabilities Code.19    (r) (Blank). "Independent medical evaluation" means an 20assessment by a mental health provider who is not currently 21providing treatment to the applicant and will not seek 22reimbursement from the program for continuing treatment after 23the assessment. A provider may seek reimbursement for the 24assessment.25(Source: P.A. 102-27, eff. 6-25-21; 102-905, eff. 1-1-23; 26102-982, eff. 7-1-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-564, eff.   SB0118 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 08024 KTG 18070 b111-17-23; 103-1037, eff. 1-1-25; revised 6-23-25.) 2    (740 ILCS 45/4.1)  (from Ch. 70, par. 74.1)3    Sec. 4.1. In addition to other powers and duties set forth 4in this Act and other powers exercised by the Attorney 5General, the Attorney General shall:6        (1) investigate all claims and prepare and present an 7    investigatory report and a draft award determination to 8    the Court of Claims for a review period of 28 business 9    days;10        (2) upon conclusion of the review by the Court of 11    Claims, provide the applicant with a compensation 12    determination letter;13        (3) prescribe and furnish all applications and other 14    forms required to be filed in the office of the Attorney 15    General by the terms of this Act;16        (4) represent the interests of the State of Illinois 17    in any hearing before the Court of Claims; and18        (5) upon failure to comply with Section 4.2, the 19    Attorney General's office shall have the power to issue 20    subpoenas to compel the production of law enforcement 21    reports maintained by law enforcement agencies; and .22        (6) with the consent of an applicant, request and 23    obtain supporting documentation required to verify the 24    claim, including, but not limited to, documentation from 25    hospitals, health care providers, providers of services to   SB0118 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 08024 KTG 18070 b1    victims or applicants, employers, insurance companies, and 2    other third parties relevant to the claim. 3    The changes made to this Section by this amendatory Act of 4the 101st General Assembly apply to actions commenced or 5pending on or after January 1, 2022. 6(Source: P.A. 102-27, eff. 6-25-21; 103-1037, eff. 8-9-24.) 7    (740 ILCS 45/4.2)8    Sec. 4.2. 9    (a) A law enforcement agency shall, within 15 days of 10receipt of a written request for a police report made to verify 11that the requirements of a crime victims compensation 12application under Section 6.1 of this Act have been met, 13provide the Attorney General's office with the law enforcement 14agency's full written report of the investigation of the crime 15for which an application for compensation has been filed. The 16law enforcement agency may redact the following from the 17report: names of confidential sources and informants; 18locations from which law enforcement conduct surveillance; and 19information related to issues of national security the law 20enforcement agency provided to or received from the United 21States Department of Homeland Security or another federal law 22enforcement agency. The Attorney General's office and a law 23enforcement agency may agree to the redaction of other 24information in the report or to the provision of necessary 25information in another format. Within 15 days of receipt of   SB0118 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 08024 KTG 18070 b1the request, a law enforcement agency shall respond to a 2written request from the Attorney General's office for 3additional information necessary to assist the Attorney 4General's office in making a recommendation for compensation.5    (b) An applicant may obtain and provide a law enforcement 6report to the Attorney General and the Attorney General may 7proceed with the review of the application. If the copy of the 8law enforcement report provided by the applicant does not 9contain all the information the Attorney General needs to move 10forward with the review of the application, the Attorney 11General may proceed with requesting from the law enforcement 12agency the full written report of the investigation. 13    (c) Records that are obtained by the Attorney General's 14office from a law enforcement agency under this Section for 15purposes of investigating an application for crime victim 16compensation shall not be disclosed to the public, including 17the applicant, by the Attorney General's office. 18    (d) Hospitals, health care providers, providers of 19services to victims or applicants, employers, insurance 20companies, and other third parties relevant to the application 21or claim shall respond in writing to the Attorney General's 22office request for confirmation, documentation, or other 23information under this Act within 30 days of receipt of the 24Attorney General's office request. If the information or 25documentation provided to the Attorney General does not 26contain all the information the Attorney General needs to move   SB0118 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 08024 KTG 18070 b1forward with review of the application or claim, the Attorney 2General may proceed with requesting further information or 3documentation.4    (e) An applicant may obtain and attach to the application 5documentation from hospitals, health care providers, providers 6of services, employers, insurance companies, and other third 7parties relevant to the claim and the Attorney General may 8proceed with the review of the application. If the 9documentation provided by the applicant with the application 10does not contain all the information the Attorney General 11needs to move forward with the review of the application, the 12Attorney General may proceed with requesting from the 13applicant or from applicable third parties additional 14documentation or information. 15    (f) Law enforcement reports or other documentation 16obtained by the Attorney General's office from an applicant, 17victim, or third party under this Act for the purposes of 18investigating an application for crime victim compensation 19shall not be disclosed to the public or any individual or 20entity, not including the individual who supplied the report 21or documentation, by the Attorney General's office. Any 22records obtained by the Attorney General's office to process 23the application, including but not limited to applications, 24documents, and photographs, shall be exempt from disclosure by 25the Attorney General's office under the Freedom of Information 26Act.  SB0118 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 08024 KTG 18070 b1(Source: P.A. 103-1037, eff. 1-1-25.) 2    (740 ILCS 45/6.1)  (from Ch. 70, par. 76.1)3    Sec. 6.1. Right to compensation. A person is entitled to 4compensation under this Act if:5        (a) Timing. Within 5 years of the occurrence of the 6    crime, or within one year after a criminal charge of a 7    person for an offense, upon which the claim is based, the 8    applicant presents an application, under oath, to the 9    Attorney General that is filed with the Court of Claims 10    and on a form prescribed in accordance with Section 7.1 11    furnished by the Attorney General. If the person entitled 12    to compensation is under 18 years of age or under other 13    legal disability at the time of the occurrence or is 14    determined by a court to be under a legal disability as a 15    result of the occurrence, he or she may present the 16    application required by this subsection within 3 years 17    after he or she attains the age of 18 years or the 18    disability is removed, as the case may be. Legal 19    disability includes a diagnosis of posttraumatic stress 20    disorder. 21        (a-1) The Attorney General and the Court of Claims may 22    accept an application presented after the period provided 23    in subsection (a) if the Attorney General determines that 24    the applicant had good cause for a delay. 25        (b) Notification. The appropriate law enforcement   SB0118 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 08024 KTG 18070 b1    officials were notified within 30 days 72 hours of the 2    perpetration of the crime allegedly causing the death or 3    injury to the victim. If the notification was made more 4    than 30 days 72 hours after the perpetration of the crime 5    and the applicant establishes that the notice was timely 6    under the circumstances, the Attorney General and the 7    Court of Claims may extend the time for reporting to law 8    enforcement. 9        For victims of offenses defined in Sections 10-9, 10    11-1.20, 11-1.30, 11-1.40, 11-1.50, 11-1.60, 12-13, and 11    12-14 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 12    2012, the appropriate law enforcement officials were 13    notified within 7 days of the perpetration of the crime 14    allegedly causing death or injury to the victim or, if the 15    notification was made more than 7 days after the 16    perpetration of the crime, the applicant establishes that 17    the notice was timely under the circumstances. 18        (b-1) If, in lieu of a law enforcement report, the 19    applicant or victim has obtained an order of protection, a 20    civil no contact order, or a stalking no contact order, 21    has presented to a medical facility for medical care or 22    sexual assault evidence collection, has presented to a 23    mental health provider for mental health care or 24    evaluation an independent medical evaluation, or is 25    engaged in a legal proceeding involving a claim that the 26    applicant or victim is a victim of human trafficking or   SB0118 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 08024 KTG 18070 b1    law enforcement use of force, such action shall constitute 2    appropriate notification under this Section.3        (b-2) For purposes of notification under this Act, a 4    victim who presents to a medical facility or mental health 5    provider shall provide information sufficient to fulfill 6    the requirements of this Section, except that the victim 7    shall not be required to identify the offender to the 8    medical or mental health provider. 9        (b-3) An applicant who is filing a claim that a law 10    enforcement officer's use of force caused injury or death, 11    may fulfill the notification requirement by complying with 12    subsection (b), filing a complaint with the Illinois Law 13    Enforcement Training Standards Board, filing a lawsuit 14    against a law enforcement officer or department, or 15    presenting evidence that the victim has obtained a 16    settlement or a verdict in a civil suit. An application 17    filed by an individual presenting evidence of a verdict in 18    a civil suit must be filed within one year after the 19    resolution of the civil suit. 20        (b-4) An applicant may provide notification to a 21    mental health provider regarding physical or psychological 22    injuries of the victim or for victims of offenses defined 23    in Sections 10-9, 11-1.20, 11-1.30, 11-1.40, 11-1.50, 24    11-1.60, 11-14.4, 12-3.2, 12-3.3, 12-3.4, 12-7.3, 12-7.4 25    of the Criminal Code of 2012, psychological injuries 26    resulting from the commission of the crime for which the   SB0118 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 08024 KTG 18070 b1    applicant is filing an application. The provider shall 2    perform an independent medical evaluation and provide the 3    provider's professional opinion as to whether the injuries 4    claimed are consistent with having resulted from the 5    commission of the crime for which the applicant is filing 6    an application. A mental health provider may seek 7    reimbursement for an evaluation under this subsection if 8    the mental health provider is not currently providing 9    treatment to the applicant, and will not seek 10    reimbursement from the program for any additional 11    treatment of the applicant. Otherwise, a mental health 12    provider may conduct an evaluation under this subsection, 13    but is ineligible for reimbursement for performing the 14    evaluation. 15        Upon completion of the independent medical evaluation, 16    the mental health provider shall complete a certification 17    form, signed under oath. The form shall be provided by the 18    Office of the Attorney General, be available on its 19    website, and contain the following: 20            (1) The provider's name, title, license number and 21        place of employment.22            (2) Contact information for the provider.23            (3) The provider's relationship with the 24        applicant.25            (4) The date the crime was reported to the 26        provider.  SB0118 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 08024 KTG 18070 b1            (5) The reported crime.2            (6) The date and location of the crime.3            (7) If there are physical injuries, what injuries 4        that the mental health provider can attest to being 5        present on the day of the reporting if they are 6        consistent with the crime reported to the provider.7            (8) If there are psychological injuries, whether 8        the provider in his or her professional opinion 9        believes that the injuries presented on the day of the 10        reporting are consistent with the crime reported to 11        the provider.12            (9) A detailed summary of the incident, as 13        reported.14            (10) Any documentation or photos that relates 15        relate to the crime of violence for which the 16        applicant is seeking reimbursement. 17        (b-5) If a mental health provider who provides a 18    certification form pursuant to subsection (b-4) seeks 19    reimbursement from the program for treatment of the 20    applicant, or an applicant seeks reimbursement for 21    payments made to the mental health provider for treatment, 22    compensation for services provided by the mental health 23    provider shall be limited to Medicare-approved rates. 24    Pursuant to subsection (g) of Section 10.1, a mental 25    health provider may not seek reimbursement for services 26    provided to an applicant if the applicant has not   SB0118 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 08024 KTG 18070 b1    exhausted the benefits reasonably available under any 2    governmental, medical, or health insurance program.3        (b-6) If an applicant was receiving treatment from a 4    mental health provider before the commission of the crime, 5    and the mental health provider provides a certification 6    form pursuant to subsection (b-4), the mental health 7    provider may only seek reimbursement from the program for 8    treatment that is in addition to the treatment the 9    applicant was already receiving before the commission of 10    the crime. 11        (c) Cooperation. The applicant has cooperated with law 12    enforcement officials in the apprehension and prosecution 13    of the assailant. If the applicant or victim has obtained 14    an order of protection, a civil no contact order, or a 15    stalking no contact order, has presented to a medical 16    facility for medical care or sexual assault evidence 17    collection, obtained an evaluation independent medical 18    examination from a mental health provider as described in 19    subsection (b-4), has taken any of the actions described 20    in subsection (b-3), or is engaged in a legal proceeding 21    involving a claim that the applicant or victim is a victim 22    of human trafficking, such action shall constitute 23    cooperation under this subsection (c). If the victim is 24    under 18 years of age at the time of the commission of the 25    offense, the following shall constitute cooperation under 26    this subsection (c):   SB0118 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 08024 KTG 18070 b1            (1) the applicant or the victim files a police 2        report with a law enforcement agency;3            (2) a mandated reporter reports the crime to law 4        enforcement; or5            (3) a person with firsthand knowledge of the crime 6        reports the crime to law enforcement. 7        In evaluating cooperation, the Attorney General and 8    Court of Claims may consider the victim's age, physical 9    condition, psychological state, cultural or linguistic 10    barriers, and compelling health and safety concerns, 11    including, but not limited to, a reasonable fear of 12    retaliation or harm that would jeopardize the well-being 13    of the victim or the victim's family, and giving due 14    consideration to the degree of cooperation that the victim 15    or derivative victim is capable of in light of the 16    presence of any of these factors, or any other factor the 17    Attorney General considers relevant. 18        (d) If the applicant is not barred from receiving 19    compensation under Section 10.1.20        (e) (Blank).21        (f) (Blank).22        (g) (Blank).23    Furnishing an evaluation as described in subsection (b-4) 24or furnishing another document as evidence of notification or 25cooperation under this Section may not be construed to waive 26any confidentiality or privilege that may exist between the   SB0118 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 08024 KTG 18070 b1victim or applicant and a third party. 2    The changes made to this Section by this amendatory Act of 3the 101st General Assembly apply to actions commenced or 4pending on or after January 1, 2022.5(Source: P.A. 102-27, eff. 6-25-21; 103-1037, eff. 1-1-25.) 6    (740 ILCS 45/7.1)  (from Ch. 70, par. 77.1)7    Sec. 7.1. (a) The application form furnished by the Office 8of the Attorney General and published on its website shall 9include fields for the applicant to set out: 10        (1) the name and address of the victim;11        (2) if the victim is deceased, the name and address of 12    the applicant and his or her relationship to the victim, 13    the names and addresses of other persons dependent on the 14    victim for their support and the extent to which each is so 15    dependent, and other persons who may be entitled to 16    compensation for a pecuniary loss;17        (3) the date and nature of the crime on which the 18    application for compensation is based;19        (4) the date and place where notification under 20    Section 6.1 was given and to whom, or the date and place of 21    issuance of an order of protection, no contact order, 22    evidence of a legal proceeding involving human 23    trafficking, or in cases of a law enforcement officer's 24    use of force, another form of documentation allowable 25    under Section 6.1;  SB0118 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 08024 KTG 18070 b1        (4.5) if the victim is providing supplemental forms of 2    documentation, that documentation, the date the victim 3    obtained that other form of documentation and the type of 4    documentation; 5        (5) the nature and extent of the injuries sustained by 6    the victim, and the names and addresses of those giving 7    medical and hospitalization treatment to the victim;8        (6) the pecuniary loss to the applicant and to such 9    other persons as are specified under item (2) resulting 10    from the injury or death;11        (7) the amount of benefits, payments, or awards, if 12    any, payable under:13            (a) the Workers' Compensation Act,14            (b) the Dram Shop Act,15            (c) any claim, demand, or cause of action based 16        upon the crime-related injury or death,17            (d) the Federal Medicare program,18            (e) the State Public Aid program,19            (f) Social Security Administration burial 20        benefits,21            (g) Veterans administration burial benefits,22            (h) life, health, accident, vehicle, towing, or 23        liability insurance,24            (i) the Criminal Victims' Escrow Account Act,25            (j) the Sexual Assault Survivors Emergency 26        Treatment Act,   SB0118 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 08024 KTG 18070 b1            (k) restitution, or 2            (l) any other source;3        (8) releases authorizing the surrender to the Court of 4    Claims or Attorney General of reports, documents and other 5    information relating to the matters specified under this 6    Act and rules promulgated in accordance with the Act;7        (9) such other information as the Court of Claims or 8    the Attorney General reasonably requires; .9        (10) whether the applicant is applying for an 10    emergency award under Section 10.2. 11    (b) The Attorney General may require that materials 12substantiating the facts stated in the application be 13submitted with that application.14    (b-5) The victim or applicant may provide to the Attorney 15General a sworn statement by the victim or applicant that 16attests to the victim's or applicant's experience of a crime 17or crimes of violence, in addition to documentation required 18under this Act. If the victim or applicant has additional 19corroborating evidence beyond those described in this Act, the 20victim or applicant may provide the following documents: law 21enforcement report; medical records; confirmation of sexual 22assault evidence collection; order of protection; civil no 23contact order, stalking no contact order; photographs; letter 24from a service provider who serves victims of crime; affidavit 25from a witness of the crime of violence; court record; 26military record; or any other corroborating evidence. Such   SB0118 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 08024 KTG 18070 b1documentation or statement may be used to supplement required 2documentation to verify the incident but is not required. If 3an applicant is seeking an exception under subsection (b) or 4(c-1) of Section 6.1, the applicant shall provide any 5additional documentation, information, or statement that 6substantiates the facts stated in the application. 7    (c) An applicant, on his or her own motion, may file an 8amended application or additional substantiating materials to 9correct inadvertent errors or omissions at any time before the 10original application has been disposed of by the Court of 11Claims or the Attorney General. In either case, the filing of 12additional information or of an amended application shall be 13considered for the purpose of this Act to have been filed at 14the same time as the original application.15    For claims submitted on or after January 1, 2022, an 16amended application or additional substantiating materials to 17correct inadvertent errors or omissions may be filed at any 18time before the original application is disposed of by the 19Attorney General or the Court of Claims.20    (d) Determinations submitted by the Attorney General to 21the Court of Claims shall be available to the Court of Claims 22for review. The Attorney General shall provide the sources and 23evidence relied upon as a basis for a compensation 24determination.25    (e) The changes made to this Section by this amendatory 26Act of the 101st General Assembly apply to actions commenced   SB0118 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 08024 KTG 18070 b1or pending on or after January 1, 2022. 2(Source: P.A. 102-27, eff. 6-25-21; 102-905, eff. 1-1-23; 3103-1037, eff. 1-1-25.) 4    (740 ILCS 45/8.1)  (from Ch. 70, par. 78.1)5    Sec. 8.1. If an applicant does not submit all materials 6substantiating his or her claim as requested of him or her by 7the Attorney General, and the Attorney General is unable to 8otherwise obtain such materials within 45 days of receiving 9the claim, the Attorney General shall notify the applicant in 10writing of the specific additional items of information or 11materials required and that he or she has 45 days in which to 12furnish those items to the Attorney General. The Attorney 13General shall report an applicant's failure to comply within 1445 days of the foregoing notice to the Court of Claims. No 15award of compensation shall be made for any portion of the 16applicant's claim that is not substantiated by the applicant. 17An applicant may request an extension of time from the 18Attorney General prior to the expiration of the 45-day period.19    After an application has been filed, an applicant's 20failure to respond to communication from the Office of the 21Attorney General or the Court of Claims or a failure to provide 22necessary documentation to substantiate the request for 23compensation may result in the claim being closed without 24compensation. An applicant may submit to have the claim 25reopened when the applicant is able to provide missing   SB0118 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 08024 KTG 18070 b1information and communicate regarding the claim. 2    Failure to update the Office of the Attorney General with 3changes to the applicant's contact information after the 4application is submitted to the Office of the Attorney General 5may result in applications that are not filed with the Court of 6Claims or claims that are closed without compensation. 7(Source: P.A. 102-27, eff. 1-1-22; 103-1037, eff. 1-1-25.) 8    (740 ILCS 45/10.2)9    Sec. 10.2. Emergency awards. 10    (a) If it appears, prior to taking action on an 11application, that the claim is one for which compensation is 12probable, and undue hardship will result to the applicant if 13immediate payment is not made, the Attorney General may 14recommend and the Court may make an emergency award of 15compensation to the applicant, pending a final decision in the 16case. The Court shall issue a voucher for payment to the 17Comptroller of an emergency award after receiving notice of 18the decision to grant the emergency award. If the Comptroller 19is not able to release the voucher for payment within 10 20business days of receiving a voucher for payment from the 21Court, the Comptroller shall notify the Court of Claims. 22Emergency awards may be issued to the applicant for the 23purpose of paying funeral and burial expenses directly to a 24funeral home for expenses that have been incurred or that the 25applicant has been quoted, and for relocation expenses   SB0118 Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 08024 KTG 18070 b1incurred or due to be incurred by an applicant. The amount of 2emergency compensation shall be deducted from any final award 3made as a result of the claim. The full amount of the emergency 4award if no final award is made shall be repaid by the 5applicant to the State of Illinois. If the amount of emergency 6compensation exceeds the actual amount the applicant incurs, 7the difference shall be repaid to the State. 8    (b) Emergency award applicants must satisfy all 9requirements under Section 6.1 of this Act.10    (c) The Office of the Attorney General shall include a 11designated section in the application form described in 12Section 7.1 for the applicant to request an emergency award. 13(Source: P.A. 102-27, eff. 1-1-22.)